Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB614.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 131.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The department shall requisition the Finance and Administration Cabinet to furnish
to local officials an adequate supply of forms for listing property for taxation and
other forms and blanks the state is required by law to provide. The books and
records prescribed for use by property valuation administrators, county clerks,
sheriffs and other county tax collectors shall be designed to promote economical
operation, adequate control, availability of useful information, and safekeeping.
(2) The department may confer with, advise and direct local officials respecting their
duties relating to taxation, and shall supervise the officials in the performance of
those duties. The department shall provide to the property valuation administrators
up-to-date appraisal manuals outlining uniform procedures for appraising all types
of real and personal property assessed by them. The property valuation
administrators shall follow the uniform procedures for appraising property outlined
in these manuals. The department shall maintain and make accessible to all property
valuation administrators a statewide commercial real property comparative sales
file. The department, by authorized agents, may visit local governmental units and
officers for investigational purposes, when necessary.
(3) The department [of Revenue ]shall conduct a biennial performance audit of each
property valuation administrator's office. This audit shall include, but shall not be
limited to, an inspection of maps and records, an appraisal study of real property,
and an evaluation of the overall effectiveness of the office. Each property valuation
administrator's office shall provide the department with access to its files, maps and
records during the audit. The department shall prepare a report on assessment
equity and quality for each county based on the performance audit, and shall
provide a copy to the Legislative Research Commission.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 10/10/2025 11:42 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1053
(4) The department shall arrange for an annual conference of the property valuation
administrators, or the county officers whose duty it is to assess property for
taxation, to give them systematic instruction in the fair and just valuation and
assessment of property, and their duty in connection therewith. The conference
shall continue not more than five (5) days. The officers shall attend and take part in
the conference, unless prevented by illness or other reason satisfactory to the
commissioner. Any officer willfully failing to attend the conference may be
removed from office by the Circuit Court of the county where he was elected. If the
officer participates in all sessions of the conference, one-half (1/2) of his actual and
necessary expenses in attending the conference shall be paid by the state, and the
other half shall be paid by the county from which he attends. Each officer shall
prepare an itemized statement showing his actual and necessary expenses, and if it
is found regular and supported by proper receipts it shall be approved by the
department before payment.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 10/10/2025 11:42 AM Jacketed